Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.468

Washington achieving a better life experience program—Governing board authority.

(1) The Washington achieving a better life experience program governing board is authorized to design, administer, manage, promote, and market the Washington achieving a better life experience program. The governing board is further authorized to contract with other organizations to administer, manage, promote, or market the Washington achieving a better life experience program. This program must allow for the creation of savings or investment accounts for eligible individuals with disabilities and the funds must be invested.

(2) The governing board may consult with the office of the state treasurer, the department of social and health services, and the state investment board in implementing the Washington achieving a better life experience program. The governing board is authorized to formulate and adopt any policies and rules necessary to implement and operate the Washington achieving a better life experience program consistent with chapter 39, Laws of 2016. The governing board is further authorized to establish a reasonable fee structure for Washington achieving a better life experience program account holders.

(3) The governing board shall take any action required to keep the program in compliance with requirements of this chapter and as required to qualify as a "qualified ABLE program" as defined in section 529A of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or any rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of the United States treasury pursuant to that act.

[ 2016 c 39 s 5.]